en: Puffed legumes, Popped legumes
es: Leguminosas infladas
fr: Graines de légumineuses soufflées
hr: Napuhane mahunarke
nl: Gepofte peulvruchten

en: Puffed soybeans
es: Soja inflada
fr: Soja soufflé
hr: Napuhana soja
nl: Gepofte sojabonen

en: Legume butters
ca: Mantega de llegum
de: Hülsenfruchtbutter
es: Mantecas de leguminosas
fi: palkokasvivoit
fr: Beurres de légumineuses
he: חמאות קטניות
hr: Maslaci od mahunarki
it: Burro di legumi
nl: Peulvruchtenpastas
pt: Manteigas de legumes

en: Soybean butters, Soynut butters
es: Mantecas de soja
fr: Beurres de soja
hr: Sojini maslaci
nl: Sojaboonpastas
pt: Manteigas de soja

xx: Tofu
en: Tofu, Tofus, bean curds
ar: توفو
ba: Тофу
be: Тофу
bg: Тофу
bn: তফু
br: tofou
cv: Тофу
cy: toffw
de: Tofu, Bohnenquark, Bohnenkäse
el: Τόφου
eo: Tofuo
es: Tofu, Tofus
fa: توفو
ga: tófú
he: טופו
hi: टोफ़ू
hy: Տոֆու
id: tahu
is: Tófú
ja: 豆腐
jv: Tahu
ka: ტოფუ
kk: Тофу
km: តៅហ៊ូ
kn: ಟೋಫ಼ು
ko: 두부
lo: ເຕົາຮູ້
lt: Sojų varškė
lv: tofu, tofoe
mk: то́фу
ms: Tauhu
my: တိုဟူး
ne: तोफु
nl: tofu, Tahoe
or: ଟୋଫୁ
pa: ਟੋਫੂ
ru: тофу
sr: Тофу
su: Tahu
ta: டோஃபூ
th: เต้าหู้
tl: Tokwa
uk: Тофу
vi: Đậu phụ
zh: 豆腐

en: Silken tofu
fr: Tofu soyeux

en: Plain tofu
fr: Tofu nature
hr: Obični tofu
nl: Tofu natuur
pl: Tofu naturalne
sv: Tofu naturell

en: Smoked tofu
bg: Пушено тофу
da: Røget tofu
fr: Tofu fumé
hr: Dimljeni tofu
nl: Gerookte tofu
pl: Tofu wędzone
sv: Rökt tofu, tofu rökt

en: Beech wood smoked tofu
sv: Bokspånsrökt tofu, Tofu bokspånsrökt

en: Alder wood smoked tofu
sv: Alspånsrökt tofu
zh: 桤木烟熏豆腐

en: Fried tofu
da: Ristet tofu
fr: Tofu frit
sv: Friterad tofu

en: Marinated tofu
da: Marineret tofu
sv: Marinerad tofu

en: Soy marinated tofu
sv: Sojamarinerad tofu, Tofu marinerad i soja

en: Soy and ginger marinated tofu
sv: Soja- och ingefäramarinerad tofu, Tofu marinerad i soja och ingefära

en: Herb marinated tofu
sv: Örtmarinerad tofu, Tofu marinerad med örter

en: Tempeh
xx: Tempeh
ja: テンペ

en: Textured vegetable protein
de: Strukturiertes Pflanzenprotein, Geformtes Pflanzenprotein
fr: Protéine végétale texturée
hr: Teksturirani biljni protein
nl: Gestructureerde groenteproteines
pl: Teksturowane białko roślinne

en: Textured soy protein, Soy protein textured rehydrated from soy flour, soy granulates, soy chunks
de: Texturiertes Sojaprotein, Soja-Granulate
es: Proteína de soja texturizada, Soja texturizada
fr: Protéine de soja texturée
hr: Teksturirani sojin protein
it: Proteine di soia testurizzate, granulari di soia
pl: Teksturowane białko sojowe

en: Textured pea protein
fr: Protéine de pois texturée
hr: Teksturirani protein graška
pl: Teksturowane białko grochu

en: Misos, Miso
es: Misos
fi: Misot, Miso
fr: Miso
hr: Misos
ja: 味噌, みそ
nl: Misos
pl: Miso, Pasta miso